Maryland, session 2025, SB0976.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
SUBTITLE 2A. PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
1–2A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BOARD” MEANS THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RELATIONS BOARD
ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 22, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(C) “COLLECTIVE BARGAINING” MEANS:
(1) GOOD FAITH NEGOTIATIONS BY AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVES
OF EMPLOYEES AND THEIR EMPLOYER WITH THE INTENTION OF:
(I) 1. REACHING AN AGREEMENT ABOUT WAGES, HOURS,
AND OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT; AND
2. INCORPORATING THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT IN
A WRITTEN MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING OR OTHER WRITTEN AGREEMENT;
OR
(II) CLARIFYING TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT;
(2) ADMINISTRATION OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT;
OR

SENATE BILL 976 3
(3) THE VOLUNTARY ADJUSTMENT OF A DISPUTE OR DISAGREEMENT
BETWEEN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVES OF EMPLOYEES AND THEIR EMPLOYER
THAT ARISES UNDER A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING OR OTHER WRITTEN
AGREEMENT.
(D) “CONFIDENTIAL EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS:
(1) REQUIRED TO DEVELOP OR PRESENT MANAGEMENT POSITIONS
WITH RESPECT TO EMPLOYER–EMPLOYEE RELATIONS; AND
(2) WHOSE DUTIES NORMALLY REQUIRE ACCESS TO CONFIDENTIAL
INFORMATION THAT CONTRIBUTES SIGNIFICANTLY TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE
MANAGEMENT POSITIONS WITH RESPECT TO EMPLOYER–EMPLOYEE RELATIONS.
(E) “EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 22–101 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(F) “EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 22–101
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(G) “MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO GENERALLY
HAS AUTHORITY AND WHO:
(1) FORMULATES POLICY THAT IS APPLICABLE THROUGHOUT A
BARGAINING UNIT;
(2) HAS A SIGNIFICANT ROLE IN PERSONNEL ADMINISTRATION,
EMPLOYEE RELATIONS, OR THE PREPARATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF BUDGETS
FOR THE EMPLOYER; OR
(3) MAY REASONABLY BE REQUIRED TO:
(I) ASSIST DIRECTLY IN THE PREPARATION FOR AND CONDUCT
OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING NEGOTIATIONS ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYER; OR
(II) HAVE A MAJOR ROLE IN THE ADMINISTRATION OF
RESULTING COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
(H) (1) “PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
EMPLOYED BY A LOCAL EMPLOYER.
(2) “PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:

SENATE BILL 976
(I) A CONFIDENTIAL EMPLOYEE; OR
(II) A MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE.
(I) (1) “PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER” MEANS A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY,
INCLUDING A UNIT, A DEPARTMENT, OR AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY.
(2) “PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION OR THE BALTIMORE CITY
BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS;
(II) THE BOARD OF COMMUNITY COLLEGE TRUSTEES FOR A
COMMUNITY COLLEGE, INCLUDING THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF BALTIMORE CITY
COMMUNITY COLLEGE; OR
(III) A PUBLIC LIBRARY SYSTEM OR THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES
FOR THE PUBLIC LIBRARY SYSTEM, INCLUDING THE BALTIMORE COUNTY PUBLIC
LIBRARY AND THE BALTIMORE COUNTY PUBLIC LIBRARY BOARD OF TRUSTEES.
(J) “SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS AUTHORIZED
TO:
(1) HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE,
DISCHARGE, ASSIGN, REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE EMPLOYEES;
(2) RESPONSIBLY DIRECT EMPLOYEES FOR MORE THAN 50% OF THE
EMPLOYEE’S WORKING HOURS; OR
(3) ADDRESS AND RESOLVE THE GRIEVANCES OF EMPLOYEES.
1–2A–02.
(A) (1) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO EACH PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER,
PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE, AND EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF PUBLIC LOCAL
EMPLOYEES.
(2) PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES MAY FORM, JOIN, AND PARTICIPATE
IN THE ACTIVITIES OF EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS OF THEIR OWN CHOICE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF BEING REPRESENTED IN ALL MATTERS THAT RELATE TO SALARIES,
WAGES, HOURS, AND OTHER WORKING CONDITIONS.

SENATE BILL 976 5
(3) PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES, PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYERS, AND
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVES ARE SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF TITLE 22 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO MODIFY OR
TERMINATE:
(I) A BARGAINING UNIT THAT WAS RECOGNIZED OR IN
EXISTENCE ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025; OR
(II) A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO ON
OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025.
(2) (I) A BARGAINING UNIT FOR PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES MAY
NOT CONSIST OF BOTH SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEES AND NONSUPERVISORY
EMPLOYEES.
(II) IF AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION HAS BEEN CERTIFIED
UNDER STATE OR LOCAL LAW ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, TO BE AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE OF PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES, THE APPLICABLE PUBLIC LOCAL
EMPLOYER SHALL ACCRETE ALL ELIGIBLE POSITIONS INTO THE EXISTING
BARGAINING UNIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION ON REQUEST OF THE
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE.
(III) AN ACCRETION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO A
SHOWING OF INTEREST AND ELECTION BY PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES IN THE
ACCRETED POSITIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCEDURES UNDER § 22–603 OF
THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–2A–03.
(A) A PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE WHO MAY EFFECTIVELY RECOMMEND AN
ACTION LISTED IN § 1–2A–01(G) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE DEEMED A MANAGEMENT
EMPLOYEE IF THE PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE’S EXERCISE OF THE AUTHORITY
REQUIRES THE EXERCISE OF INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT AND IS NOT MERELY OF A
ROUTINE OR CLERICAL NATURE.
(B) THE EXERCISE OF ANY SINGLE FUNCTION LISTED IN § 1–2A–01(G) OF
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT NECESSARILY REQUIRE THE CONCLUSION THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL EXERCISING THAT FUNCTION IS IN FACT A MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE
WITHIN THE DEFINITION.

SENATE BILL 976
(C) IN DIFFERENTIATING A MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE FROM A
NONMANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE:
(1) A CLASS TITLE ALONE MAY NOT BE THE BASIS FOR
DETERMINATION; AND
(2) THE NATURE OF THE MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE’S WORK,
INCLUDING WHETHER A SIGNIFICANT PORTION OF THE MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE’S
WORKING TIME IS SPENT AS PART OF A TEAM THAT INCLUDES NONMANAGEMENT
EMPLOYEES, SHALL BE CONSIDERED.
1–2A–04.
(A) IF, ON THE REQUEST OF EITHER PARTY, THE BOARD DETERMINES THAT
AN IMPASSE IS REACHED IN NEGOTIATIONS BETWEEN A PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER
AND AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE, WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE DETERMINATION
IS MADE, THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, REQUEST LAST
AND BEST OFFERS FROM THE PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER AND EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE; AND
(2) ORDER THE PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER AND EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATION TO COMMENCE ARBITRATION WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER THE BOARD’S
DETERMINATION THAT AN IMPASSE HAS BEEN REACHED.
(B) THE LAST AND BEST OFFERS SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF
THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL LIST SEPARATELY:
(I) EVERY TERM OR CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT IN DISPUTE;
AND
(II) THE DEMANDS OF THE PARTY MAKING THE LAST AND BEST
OFFER; AND
(2) MAY NOT CONTAIN ITEMS OR TOPICS NOT PREVIOUSLY RAISED IN
THE BARGAINING PROCESS.
(C) WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER AN ORDER TO ARBITRATE, THE PARTIES SHALL
SELECT AN ARBITRATOR BY:

SENATE BILL 976 7
(1) AGREEMENT; OR
(2) ALTERNATELY STRIKING FROM A LIST OF SEVEN NEUTRAL
PARTIES PROVIDED BY:
(I) THE FEDERAL MEDIATION AND CONCILIATION SERVICE;
OR
(II) THE AMERICAN ARBITRATION ASSOCIATION.
(D) THE ARBITRATOR SHALL CONCLUDE THE ARBITRATION WITHIN 30 DAYS
AFTER CONVENING THE FIRST ARBITRATION SESSION.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYER AND THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE DO NOT REACH AGREEMENT
BEFORE CONCLUDING THE ARBITRATION, THE ARBITRATOR SHALL ISSUE A FINAL
WRITTEN AWARD THAT SHALL BE BINDING ON BOTH PARTIES.
(2) THE ARBITRATOR SHALL ISSUE A STATEMENT OF REASONS FOR
THE FINAL WRITTEN AWARD.
(F) THE ARBITRATOR’S AWARD SHALL CONSIDER:
(1) THE WAGES, HOURS, WORKING CONDITIONS, OR OTHER TERMS
AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT OF SIMILAR EMPLOYEES IN:
(I) SURROUNDING JURISDICTIONS; AND
(II) COMPARABLE JURISDICTIONS OUTSIDE THE STATE; AND
(2) THE ABILITY OF THE PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER AND ANY FUNDING
BODY OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO PAY, INCLUDING:
(I) THEIR EXISTING RESOURCES; AND
(II) THE COSTS OF THE AWARD.
(G) THE PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER AND EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE
SHALL SHARE THE COSTS OF THE HEARING EQUALLY.
(H) EACH NEGOTIATED PROVISION OR AWARD IS SUBJECT TO ANY OTHER
PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE CONCERNING THE FISCAL RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN
THE PUBLIC EMPLOYER AND A FUNDING BODY OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT.

SENATE BILL 976
1–2A–05.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE AND TITLE 22 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY MAY ADOPT A LOCAL LAW REGARDING LABOR RELATIONS OF PUBLIC
LOCAL EMPLOYEES.
(B) A LOCAL LAW ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT RESTRICT OR
WEAKEN THE RIGHTS PROVIDED TO PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND TITLE 22 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
1–2A–06.
EACH PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE BOARD A COPY OF
EACH CONTRACT, MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING, OR SIMILAR WRITTEN
AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO WITH THE EMPLOYEE REPRESENTATIVES PROVIDING
LABOR RELATION SERVICES.
1–2A–07.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “EXEMPT LOCAL GOVERNMENT” MEANS THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT HAS A PETITION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION GRANTED.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY
OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY PETITION THE BOARD FOR A DETERMINATION
THAT ITS LOCAL LAWS COMPLY WITH THIS TITLE AND TITLE 22 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
BOARD SHALL:
(I) DETERMINE WHETHER THE PETITIONING COUNTY’S OR
MUNICIPALITY’S LAWS COMPLY WITH THIS TITLE; AND
(II) CONSIDER WHETHER GRANTING THE PETITION WOULD
BEST EFFECTUATE THE PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE AND TITLE 22 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 976 9
(2) THE BOARD SHALL ALLOW INTERESTED EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATIONS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE CONSIDERATION OF A PETITION UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE BOARD.
(D) (1) IF THE BOARD GRANTS A PETITION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, THE EXEMPT LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, BE EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF §§ 22–205(A), 22–403, AND
22–502 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ADOPT
A LOCAL LAW GOVERNING:
1. THE COMPOSITION OF BARGAINING UNITS; AND
2. THE CALENDAR TIMELINE FOR COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING, INCLUDING IMPASSE PROCEDURES.
(2) (I) A LOCAL LAW ADOPTED BY AN EXEMPT LOCAL
GOVERNMENT THAT PROVIDES FOR THE COMPOSITION OF BARGAINING UNITS MAY
NOT EXCLUDE PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES FROM A BARGAINING UNIT OTHER THAN
AS ALLOWED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND TITLE 22 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
(II) A LOCAL LAW ADOPTED BY AN EXEMPT LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL ESTABLISH IMPASSE PROCEDURES FOR EACH BARGAINING
UNIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THE LOCAL LAW THAT:
1. ALLOW PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES OF THE EXEMPT
LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO STRIKE ON THE DECLARATION OF AN IMPASSE BY EITHER
PARTY; OR
2. A. ALLOW THE PARTIES TO APPOINT A NEUTRAL
ARBITRATOR WHO ISSUES A FINAL BINDING DECISION THAT IS TO BE IMPLEMENTED
AS A PART OF THE IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING FISCAL YEAR’S BUDGET PROCESS; AND
B. CONSIDER THE FACTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER §
1–2A–04(B)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE WHEN MAKING THE FINAL BINDING DECISION.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL RETAIN JURISDICTION OVER QUESTIONS OF
CERTIFICATIONS AS EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVES AND UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES
FOR EXEMPT LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES, AND EMPLOYEE

SENATE BILL 976
ORGANIZATIONS AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND TITLE 22 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(F) TO THE EXTENT AUTHORIZED UNDER AN APPLICABLE LAW IN EFFECT
ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, AN EMPLOYEE MAY NOT BE DETERMINED TO BE A
PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE UNDER
TITLE 22 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE SOLELY ON THE BASIS OF BEING
CONSIDERED A SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE UNDER THE APPLICABLE LAW.
Article – State Government
22–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Public Employee Relations Board.
(c) “CONFIDENTIAL EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) WHO IS REQUIRED TO DEVELOP OR PRESENT MANAGEMENT
POSITIONS WITH RESPECT TO EMPLOYER–EMPLOYEE RELATIONS; AND
(2) WHOSE DUTIES REQUIRE ACCESS TO CONFIDENTIAL
INFORMATION THAT CONTRIBUTES SIGNIFICANTLY TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE
MANAGEMENT POSITIONS WITH RESPECT TO EMPLOYER–EMPLOYEE RELATIONS.
(D) Unless specifically provided otherwise, “day” means a calendar day.
[(d)] (E) “Employee organization” means a labor organization in which public
employees participate and that has as one of its primary purposes representing public
employees.
[(e)] (F) “Exclusive representative” means an employee organization that has
been certified by the Board as an exclusive representative under Subtitle 4 of this title.
[(f)] (G) “Interested employee organization” means:
(1) an employee organization already representing employees in a
bargaining unit; or
(2) a petitioner who has met the showing of interest requirement under §
22–402 of this title.
[(g)] (H) “Lockout” means action taken by a public employer to:

SENATE BILL 976 11
(1) interrupt or prevent the continuity of the employees’ usual work for the
purpose and with the intent of coercing the employees into relinquishing rights guaranteed
by this title; or
(2) bring economic pressure on employees for the purpose of securing the
agreement of their executive representative to collective bargaining agreement terms.
(I) “MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO GENERALLY
HAS AUTHORITY AND WHO:
(1) FORMULATES POLICY THAT IS APPLICABLE THROUGHOUT A
BARGAINING UNIT;
(2) HAS A SIGNIFICANT ROLE IN PERSONNEL ADMINISTRATION,
EMPLOYEE RELATIONS, OR THE PREPARATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF BUDGETS
FOR THE EMPLOYER; OR
(3) MAY REASONABLY BE REQUIRED TO:
(I) ASSIST DIRECTLY IN THE PREPARATION FOR AND CONDUCT
OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING NEGOTIATIONS ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYER; OR
(II) HAVE A MAJOR ROLE IN THE ADMINISTRATION OF
RESULTING COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
[(h)] (J) (1) “Public employee” means an individual who holds a position by
appointment or employment in the service of a public employer with collective bargaining
rights under:
(I) Title 3 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article [or];
(II) TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE;
(III) Title 6, Subtitle 4 or 5 [or] OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; OR
(IV) Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article.
(2) “PUBLIC EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A CONFIDENTIAL EMPLOYEE; OR
(II) A MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE.

SENATE BILL 976
[(i)] (K) “Public employer” means:
(1) the State, including any unit, department, or instrumentality of the
State;
(2) A PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER, AS DEFINED IN § 1–2A–01 OF THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(3) a community college listed under § 16–702(b) of the Education Article;
and
[(3)] (4) a county board of education or the Baltimore City Board of School
Commissioners.
(L) “PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–2A–01
OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
[(j)] (M) (1) “Showing of interest form” means a written statement from a
public employee who wishes to be represented by a petitioning employee organization for
the purpose of collective bargaining.
(2) “Showing of interest form” includes:
(i) a union authorization card; or
(ii) a union membership card.
[(k)] (N) (1) “Strike” means any concerted action to impede the full and
proper performance of employment duties in order to induce, influence, coerce, or enforce
demands for a change in wages, hours, terms, or other conditions of employment.
(2) “Strike” includes a total or partial:
(i) refusal or failure to report to work;
(ii) refusal or failure to perform employment duties;
(iii) withdrawal from work;
(iv) work stoppage; or
(v) work slowdown.
(O) “SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS AUTHORIZED
TO:

SENATE BILL 976 13
(1) HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE,
DISCHARGE, ASSIGN, REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE EMPLOYEES;
(2) RESPONSIBLY DIRECT EMPLOYEES FOR MORE THAN 50% OF THE
EMPLOYEE’S WORKING HOURS; OR
(3) ADDRESS AND RESOLVE THE GRIEVANCES OF EMPLOYEES.
22–102.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that it is the public policy of the State
to encourage and protect:
(1) the exercise by public sector employees of the full freedom of
association, self–organization, and designation of representatives of their own choosing, for
the purpose of negotiating the terms and conditions of their employment or other mutual
aid or protection; AND
(2) THE RIGHTS DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR
EMPLOYEES OF THE COUNTIES, MUNICIPALITIES, AND UNITS AND
INSTRUMENTALITIES OF STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS EXCLUDED FROM THE
APPLICATION OF THE FEDERAL NATIONAL LABOR RELATIONS ACT.
22–104.
(A) AN EMPLOYEE WHO MAY EFFECTIVELY RECOMMEND ANY ACTION
LISTED IN § 22–101(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE DEEMED A MANAGEMENT
EMPLOYEE IF THE EMPLOYEE’S EXERCISE OF THE AUTHORITY REQUIRES THE
EXERCISE OF INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT AND IS NOT MERELY OF A ROUTINE OR
CLERICAL NATURE.
(B) THE EXERCISE OF ANY SINGLE FUNCTION LISTED IN § 22–101(I) OF THIS
SUBTITLE MAY NOT NECESSARILY REQUIRE THE CONCLUSION THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL EXERCISING THAT FUNCTION IS A MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE WITHIN
THE DEFINITION.
(C) IN DIFFERENTIATING A MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE FROM A
NONMANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE:
(1) A CLASS TITLE ALONE MAY NOT BE THE BASIS FOR
DETERMINATION; AND
(2) THE NATURE OF THE MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE’S WORK,
INCLUDING WHETHER A SIGNIFICANT PORTION OF THE MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE’S

SENATE BILL 976
WORKING TIME IS SPENT AS PART OF A TEAM THAT INCLUDES NONMANAGEMENT
EMPLOYEES, SHALL BE CONSIDERED.
22–207.
(b) (1) Public employers shall allow an exclusive representative to:
(i) meet with a new employee in a bargaining unit represented by
the exclusive representative within the first full pay period of the new employee’s start
date; or
(ii) attend and participate in a new employee program that includes
one or more employees who are in a bargaining unit represented by the exclusive
representative.
(2) The new employee program described in paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection may be a new employee orientation, training, or other program that the public
employer and an exclusive representative negotiate in accordance with:
(I) Title 6, Subtitle 4 or 5 of the Education Article[,];
(II) Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article[, or];
(III) Title 3 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article;
(IV) TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE; OR
(V) A LOCAL LAW THE BOARD APPROVES IN A PETITION FILED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–2A–07 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, the exclusive
representative shall be allowed at least 30 minutes to meet with the new employee or to
collectively address all new employees in attendance during a new employee program.
(4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a
meeting between the new employee and the exclusive representative shall be in person.
(ii) An exclusive representative may choose to meet with a new
employee by video or similar technology if public health concerns necessitate that a meeting
be conducted remotely.
(5) A public employer and an exclusive representative may negotiate a
period of time that is more than 30 minutes in accordance with:
(I) Title 6, Subtitle 4 or 5 of the Education Article[,];

SENATE BILL 976 15
(II) Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article[, or];
(III) Title 3 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article;
(IV) TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE; OR
(V) A LOCAL LAW THE BOARD APPROVES IN A PETITION FILED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–2A–07 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(6) A public employer:
(i) shall encourage an employee to meet with the exclusive
representative or attend the portion of a new employee program designated for an exclusive
representative to address new employees; and
(ii) may not require an employee to meet with an exclusive
representative or attend the portion of a new employee program designated for an exclusive
representative to address new employees if the employee objects to attending.
22–209.
(f) If an authorization for a public employer to make membership dues deduction
was in effect on June 30, 2023, OR, FOR A PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYER, JUNE 30, 2025:
(1) the right of the employee organization to membership dues deduction
shall continue unless the right is terminated under subsection (d) of this section; and
(2) the employee organization may not be required to present new
authorization under subsection (a) of this section.
22–305.
(a) The Board shall appoint:
(1) a deputy director primarily responsible for Executive Branch labor
relations;
(2) a deputy director primarily responsible for public school labor relations;
[and]
(3) a deputy director primarily responsible for public higher education
labor relations; AND

SENATE BILL 976
(4) A DEPUTY DIRECTOR PRIMARILY RESPONSIBLE FOR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT LABOR RELATIONS.
22–306.
(a) The Board is responsible for administering and enforcing provisions of:
(1) this title;
(2) Title 6, Subtitles 4 and 5 of the Education Article;
(3) Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article; [and]
(4) Title 3 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article; AND
(5) TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(b) In addition to any other powers or duties provided for elsewhere in this title,
Title 6, Subtitle 4 or 5 of the Education Article, Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article,
[and], Title 3 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article, AND TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 2A
OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, the Board may:
(1) establish procedures for, supervise the conduct of, and resolve disputes
about elections for exclusive representatives;
(2) establish procedures for and resolve disputes about petitions for
bargaining unit clarification;
(3) establish procedures for and resolve disputes about petitions and
elections for decertification of an exclusive representative;
(4) investigate and take appropriate action in response to charges of unfair
labor practices, including strikes and lockouts;
(5) establish procedures for and resolve disputes about the negotiability of
bargaining subjects;
(6) on application by an employee organization or public employer,
determine that the applicant shall be designated as a joint public employer of public
employees in an employer–employee bargaining unit determined in accordance with
Subtitle 4 of this title when such determination would best effectuate the purposes of this
subtitle; and
(7) resolve matters as provided in §§ 6–406, 6–507, and 16–707 of the
Education Article.

SENATE BILL 976 17
(c) The Board shall have broad discretion to take and order remedial actions
when it finds that a party has committed an unfair labor practice, including the restoration
of any right, pay, status, or benefit lost by a public employee or group of public employees,
due to violations of this title.
(d) To enforce the provisions of this subtitle, the Board may:
(1) issue subpoenas; and
(2) administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive
evidence.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Board shall
adopt and enforce regulations, guidelines, and policies to carry out this title.
(2) The Board may not adopt any regulation, guideline, or policy that:
(i) unnecessarily delays the resolution of disputes over elections,
unfair labor practices, or any other matter under this title; or
(ii) restricts or weakens the protections provided to public employees
and employee organizations under this title or under regulations.
(F) THE BOARD ANNUALLY SHALL PUBLISH THE DOCUMENTS REQUIRED
UNDER § 1–2A–06 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE ON THE BOARD’S
WEBSITE.
22–307.
(f) [The] IF THE BOARD ISSUES A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
appropriate deputy director shall [provide relevant information gathered in the
investigation of a charge of unfair labor practices] PRESENT THE CASE to the Board OR
THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS.
22–401.
(c) (1) An exclusive representative or a bargaining unit in existence on June
30, 2023, OR, FOR A BARGAINING UNIT FOR PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES, IN
EXISTENCE ON JUNE 30, 2025:
(i) shall continue without the requirement of an election and
certification until a question concerning representation is raised under this title; or
(ii) until the Board finds the unit not to be appropriate after
challenge by the public employer, a member of the unit, or an employee organization.

SENATE BILL 976
(2) (i) The appropriateness of the unit may not be challenged until the
expiration of any collective bargaining agreement in effect on:
1. June 30, 2023; OR
2. FOR PUBLIC LOCAL EMPLOYEES, JUNE 30, 2025.
(ii) The Board may not modify any bargaining unit determined
under existing law.
22–403.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this title, Title 6, Subtitle 4 or 5 of the
Education Article, Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article, [or] Title 3 of the State
Personnel and Pensions Article, TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, OR A LOCAL LAW THE BOARD APPROVES IN A PETITION FILED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–2A–07 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, the Board
shall determine the appropriateness of each bargaining unit.
(2) If there is no dispute about the appropriateness of the establishment of
the bargaining unit, the Board shall issue an order defining an appropriate bargaining unit.
(3) If there is a dispute about the appropriateness of the establishment of
the bargaining unit, the Board shall:
(i) conduct a hearing; and
(ii) issue an order defining an appropriate bargaining unit.
(b) If the appropriate bargaining unit as determined by the Board differs from the
bargaining unit described in the petition, the Board may:
(1) dismiss the petition; or
(2) direct an election in the appropriate bargaining unit if at least 30% of
the signatures included in the petition are of employees in the appropriate bargaining unit.
(c) A bargaining unit:
(1) may consist only of public employees; AND
(2) MAY NOT INCLUDE BOTH NONSUPERVISORY EMPLOYEES AND
SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEES.
22–501.

SENATE BILL 976 19
(A) Representatives of public employers and exclusive representatives shall meet
at reasonable times and engage in collective bargaining in good faith and to conclude a
written memorandum of understanding or other negotiated agreement in accordance with
Title 6, Subtitle 4 or 5 of the Education Article, Title 16, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article,
[or] Title 3 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article, TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 2A OF THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, OR A LOCAL LAW THE BOARD APPROVES IN A
PETITION FILED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–2A–07 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
(B) A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING OR OTHER NEGOTIATED
AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION MAY PROVIDE FOR BINDING ARBITRATION OF GRIEVANCES ARISING
UNDER THE AGREEMENT THAT THE PARTIES HAVE AGREED TO BE SUBJECT TO
ARBITRATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In this section, “local government” means Anne Arundel County, Baltimore
City, Baltimore County, Harford County, Howard County, Montgomery County, Prince
George’s County, the City of Annapolis, the City of Bowie, the City of Cumberland, the City
of College Park, the City of Hagerstown, the City of Rockville, the City of Salisbury, and
the City of Takoma Park.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that a delay in the implementation of
Section 1 of this Act for a local government shall ensure the harmonious continuation of
existing collective bargaining relationships without interruption and allow local
governments with existing collective bargaining legislation to resolve a petition filed under
§ 1–2A–07 of the Local Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, and may
not be used to plan for or engage in activities that would discourage or otherwise coerce
employees seeking to hold an election.
(c) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
Section 1 of this Act does not apply to a local government before July 1, 2026.
(ii) Beginning on the effective date of this Act, a local government
may file a petition with the Public Employee Relations Board in accordance with §
1–2A–07 of the Local Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(2) Section 1 of this Act shall apply to a local government on or after July
1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid

SENATE BILL 976
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.